Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.030

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Administration of the construction contract" means the periodic observation of materials and work to observe the general compliance with the construction contract documents, and does not include responsibility for supervising construction methods and processes, site conditions, equipment operations, personnel, or safety on the worksite.

(2) "Board" means the state board of licensure for landscape architects.

(3) "Certificate of licensure" means the certificate issued by the director to newly licensed landscape architects.

(4) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(5) "Design" means the conceiving, planning, delineation, siting, and arrangement of natural and built features. Where applied to the discussion of structures or utility systems, design does not include the act of engineering such features.

(6) "Director" means the director of licensing.

(7) "Engineer" means an individual who is registered as an engineer under chapter 18.43 RCW.

(8) "Engineering" means the "practice of engineering" as defined in RCW 18.43.020.

(9) "Landscape architect" means an individual who engages in the practice of landscape architecture.

(10) "Landscape architecture" means the rendering of professional services in connection with consultations, investigations, reconnaissance, research, planning, design, construction document preparation, construction administration, or teaching supervision in connection with the development of land areas where, and to the extent that, the dominant purpose of such services is the preservation, enhancement, or determination of proper land uses, natural land features, ground cover and planting, naturalistic and aesthetic values, the settings and approaches to structures or other improvements, or natural drainage and erosion control. This practice includes the location, design, and arrangement of such tangible objects as pools, walls, steps, trellises, canopies, and such features as are incidental and necessary to the purposes in this chapter. Landscape architecture involves the design and arrangement of land forms and the development of outdoor space including, but not limited to, the design of public parks, trails, playgrounds, cemeteries, home and school grounds, and the development of industrial and recreational sites.

(11) "Licensed" means holding a currently valid certificate of licensure issued by the director authorizing the practice of landscape architecture.

(12) "Person" means any individual, partnership, professional service corporation, corporation, joint stock association, joint venture, or any other entity authorized to do business in the state.

(13) "Practice of landscape architecture" means the rendering of services where landscape architectural education, training, experience, and the application of mathematical, physical, and social science principles are applied in consultation, evaluation, planning, design including, but not limited to, the preparation and filing of plans, drawings, specifications, and other contract documents, and administration of contracts relative to projects principally directed at the functional and aesthetic use and preservation of land.

[ 2009 c 370 s 4; 1979 c 158 s 73; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.